North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 4. Consolidated Judicial Retirement Act.

§ 135-50.
Short title and purpose.

This Article shall be known and may be cited as the “Consolidated Judicial Retirement Act.”

The purpose of this Article is to improve the administration of justice by attracting and retaining the most highly qualified talent available within the State to the positions of justice and judge, district attorney and solicitor, public defender, the
Director of Indigent Defense Services, and clerk of superior court, within the General Court of Justice.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1031, ss. 2, 3; 2005-276, s. 29.30A(a); 2005-345, s. 42; 2007-323, s. 28.21B(a); 2008-107, s. 26.24(a).

Open Enrollment — Contributory Death Benefit.

Session Laws 2007-388, s. 1, provides: “Notwithstanding any section of law or any rules and regulations adopted by the Boards of Trustees to the contrary, the Retirement Systems Division of the Department of State Treasurer shall allow for an open enrollment
period in the Contributory Death Benefit for Retired Members of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, and the Legislative
Retirement System. This open enrollment period shall begin February 1, 2008, and end May 31, 2008. The Retirement Systems Division shall send notice by U.S. mail of the open enrollment period to all retirees who elected not to be covered
under this benefit or who failed to make any election at the time of their retirement and shall send a second notice by U.S. mail to any such retiree who fails to make an election within 60 days of the notification of the open enrollment
period. Notice, at minimum, shall consist of notification of the open enrollment period and the consequences of failure to respond within the specified time frames, informational materials explaining the benefit program and the associated
costs, and a preprinted personalized enrollment application to facilitate the enrollment process indicating each individual retiree’s contribution rate. The contribution rate for retirees electing coverage during the open enrollment
period shall be increased by eleven and one-tenth percent (11.1%) the rate established for retirees who elected coverage when first eligible, at retirement. For retirees electing coverage during this open enrollment period, coverage
shall become effective the first of the month following the month in which the election of coverage is received by the Retirement Systems Division but not before February 1, 2008. Contribution rates for coverage shall be based upon
the retiree’s nearest age as of the effective date of coverage and shall begin by deduction from the retiree’s net monthly retirement allowance in the month in which coverage becomes effective. Coverage elected by retirees during this
open enrollment period shall be subject to all other laws and rules and regulations adopted by the Board of Trustees governing the Contributory Death Benefit for Retired Members.”

§ 135-51.
Scope.

This Article provides consolidated retirement benefits for all justices and judges, district attorneys, and solicitors who are serving on January 1, 1974, and who become such thereafter; and for all clerks of superior court who are so serving on January
1, 1975, and who become such after that date; and for all public defenders who are serving on July 1, 2007, and who become public defenders after that date; and for the Director of Indigent Defense Services who is serving on July
1, 2008, and those who become Director of Indigent Defense Services after that date.

For justices and judges of the appellate and superior court divisions of the General Court of Justice who so served prior to January 1, 1974, the provisions of this Article supplement and, under certain circumstances, replace the provisions of Articles
6 and 8, as the case may be, of Chapter 7A of the General Statutes.For district attorneys and judges of the district court of the General Court of Justice who so served prior to January 1, 1974, the provisions of this Article supplement
and, under certain circumstances, replace the provisions of Article 1 of this Chapter.For clerks of superior court of the General Court of Justice who so served prior to January 1, 1975, the provisions of this Article supplement
and, under certain circumstances, replace the provisions of Article 1 of this Chapter.

The retirement benefits of any person who becomes a justice or judge, district attorney, or solicitor on and after January 1, 1974, or clerk of superior court on and after January 1, 1975, or public defender on or after July 1, 2007, or the Director of
Indigent Defense Services on or after July 1, 2008, shall be determined solely in accordance with the provisions of this Article.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1031, s. 4; 2005-276, s. 29.30A(b); 2005-345, s. 42; 2007-323, s. 28.21B(b); 2008-107, s. 26.24(b).

§ 135-52.
Application of Article 1; administration.

References in Article 1 of this Chapter to the provisions of “this Chapter” shall not necessarily apply to this Article. However, except as otherwise provided in this Article, the provisions of Article 1 are applicable and shall apply to and govern the
administration of the Retirement System established hereby. Not in limitation of the foregoing, the provisions of G.S. 135-5(h), 135-5(n), 135-9, 135-10, 135-12 and 135-17 are specifically applicable to the Retirement System established
hereby.

The provisions of this Article shall be administered by the Board of Trustees of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1.

§ 135-53.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases as used in this Article, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, shall have the following meanings:

“Accumulated contributions” with respect to any member shall mean the sum of all the amounts deducted from the compensation of the member pursuant to

G.S. 135-68

since he last became a member and credited to his account in the annuity savings fund, plus any amount standing to his credit pursuant to G.S. 135-67(c) as a result of a prior period of membership, plus any amounts
credited to his account pursuant to G.S. 135-28.1(b) or 135-56(b), together with regular interest on all such amounts computed as provided in G.S. 135-7(b).

“Actuarial equivalent” shall mean a benefit of equal value when computed upon the bases of such mortality tables as shall be adopted by the Board of Trustees, and regular interest.

(2a)
“Average final compensation” shall mean the average annual compensation of a member during the 48 consecutive calendar months of membership service producing the highest such average.

“Beneficiary” shall mean any person in receipt of a retirement allowance or other benefit as provided in this Article.

“Board of Trustees” shall mean the Board of Trustees established by

G.S. 135-6

.

(4a) “Clerk of superior court” shall mean the clerk of superior court provided for in G.S. 7A-100(a).

“Compensation” shall mean all salaries and wages derived from public funds which are earned by a member of the Retirement System for his service as a justice or judge, or district attorney, or clerk of superior court, or public defender, or the Director
of Indigent Defense Services. Effective July 1, 2009, “compensation” also means payment of military differential wages. “Compensation” shall not include local supplementation as authorized under

G.S. 7A-300.1

for Judicial Department employees.

(5a) “Consumer Price Index” shall mean the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), U.S. City Average, all items, not seasonally adjusted, standard reference base, as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the U.S. Department of Labor.

“Creditable service” shall mean for any member the total of his prior service plus his membership service.

(6a) “Director of Indigent Defense Services” shall mean the Director of Indigent Defense Services as provided for in

G.S. 7A-498.6

.

(6b) “District attorney” shall mean the district attorney or solicitor provided for in

G.S. 7A-60

.

“Filing” when used in reference to an application for retirement shall mean the receipt of an acceptable application on a form provided by the Retirement System.

“Final compensation” shall mean for any member the annual equivalent of the rate of compensation most recently applicable to him.

“Judge” shall mean any justice or judge of the General Court of Justice and the administrative officer of the courts.

“Medical board” shall mean the board of physicians provided for in

G.S. 135-6

.

“Member” shall mean any person included in the membership of the Retirement System as provided in this Article.

“Membership service” shall mean service as a judge, district attorney, clerk of superior court, public defender, or the Director of Indigent Defense Services rendered while a member of the Retirement System.

“Previous system” shall mean, with respect to any member, the retirement benefit provisions of Article 6 and Article 8 of Chapter 7A of the General Statutes, to the extent that such Article or Articles were formerly applicable to the member, and in the
case of judges of the district court division, district attorney, public defender, the Director of Indigent Defense Services, and and clerk of superior court of the General Court of Justice, the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement
System.

“Prior service” shall mean service rendered by a member, prior to his membership in the Retirement System, for which credit is allowable under

G.S. 135-56

.

(14a) “Public defender” means a public defender provided for in

G.S. 7A-498.7

, the appellate defender provided for in

G.S. 7A-498.8

, the capital defender, and the juvenile defender.

“Regular interest” shall mean interest compounded annually at such a rate as shall be determined by the Board of Trustees in accordance with G.S. 135-7(b).

“Retirement” under this Chapter shall mean the commencement of monthly retirement benefits, along with the termination of employment and the complete separation from active service with no intent or agreement, expressed or implied, to return to service.
A retirement allowance under the provisions of this Chapter may only be granted upon retirement of a member. In order for a member’s retirement to become effective in any month, the member must perform no work in a position covered
by this Article or by an Optional Retirement Program established under

G.S. 135-5.1

or

G.S. 135-5.4

at any time during the same month immediately following the effective first day of retirement.

“Retirement allowance” shall mean the periodic payments to which a beneficiary becomes entitled under the provisions of this Article.

“Retirement System” shall mean the “Consolidated Judicial Retirement System” of North Carolina, as established in this Article.

“Year” as used in this Article shall mean the regular fiscal year beginning July 1 and ending June 30 in the following calendar year, unless otherwise defined by regulation of the Board of Trustees.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1031, ss. 5-10; 1999-237, s. 28.24(f); 2005-276, s. 29.30A(c); 2005-345, s. 42; 2007-323, s. 28.21B(c); 2008-107, s. 26.24(c); 2009-66, s. 6(g); 2010-31, s. 29.7(e); 2013-288,
s. 4(c); 2014-97, ss. 4(c), 6; 2018-85, s. 4.

§ 135-54.
Name and date of establishment.

A Retirement System is hereby established and placed under the management of the Board of Trustees for the purpose of providing retirement allowances and other benefits under the provisions of this Article for justices and judges, district attorneys,
public defenders, the Director of Indigent Defense Services, and clerks of superior court of the General Court of Justice of North Carolina, and their survivors. This Retirement System is a governmental plan, within the meaning of
Section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code. Therefore, the nondiscrimination rules of Sections 401(a)(5) and 401(a)(26) of the Code do not apply. The Retirement System so created shall be established as of January 1, 1974.

The Retirement System shall have the power and privileges of a corporation and shall be known as the “Consolidated Judicial Retirement System of North Carolina,” and by such name all of its business shall be transacted.

Consistent with Section 401(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, all contributions from participating employers and participating employees to this Retirement System shall be made to funds held in trust through trust instruments that have the purposes
of distributing trust principal and income to retired members and their beneficiaries and of paying other definitely determinable benefits under this Chapter, after meeting the necessary expenses of administering this Retirement System.
Neither the trust corpus nor income from this trust can be used for purposes other than the exclusive benefit of members or their beneficiaries, except that employer contributions made to the trust under a good faith mistake of fact
may be returned to an employer, where the refund can occur within less than one year after the mistaken contribution was made, consistent with the rule adopted by the Board of Trustees. The Retirement System shall have a consolidated
Plan document, consisting of relevant statutory provisions in this Chapter, associated regulations in the North Carolina Administrative Code, substantive and procedural information on the official forms used by the Retirement System,
and policies and minutes of the Board of Trustees.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1031, s. 11; 2005-276, s. 29.30A(d); 2005-345, s. 42; 2007-323, s. 28.21B(d); 2008-107, s. 26.24(d); 2012-130, s. 7(d).

§ 135-55.
Membership.

The membership of the Retirement System shall consist of:

All judges and district attorneys in office on January 1, 1974;

All persons who become judges and district attorneys or reenter service as judges and district attorneys after January 1, 1974;

All clerks of superior court in office on January 1, 1975;

All persons who become clerks of superior court or reenter service as clerks of superior court after January 1, 1975;

All public defenders in office on July 1, 2007;

All persons who become public defenders or reenter service as public defenders after July 1, 2007;

The Director of Indigent Defense Services on July 1, 2008; and

All persons who become the Director of Indigent Defense Services or reenter service as the Director of Indigent Defense Services after July 1, 2008.

The membership of any person in the Retirement System shall cease upon:

The withdrawal of his accumulated contributions after he is no longer a judge, district attorney, public defender, the Director of Indigent Defense Services, or clerk of superior court, or

His retirement under the provisions of the Retirement System, or

His death.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1031, ss. 12, 13; 2005-276, s. 29.30A(e); 2005-345, s. 42; 2007-323, s. 28.21B(e); 2008-107, s. 26.24(e).

§ 135-56.
(Effective until January 1, 2022) Creditable service.

Subject to such rules and regulations as the Board of Trustees shall adopt with regard to the verification of a judge’s prior service, the prior service of a judge shall consist of his service rendered prior to January 1, 1974, as a justice of the Supreme
Court, judge of the Court of Appeals, judge of the superior court, judge of the district court division of the General Court of Justice, as administrative officer of the courts, or as a solicitor or district attorney.

On or before December 31, 2021, when membership ceases as a result of a member’s withdrawal of his or her accumulated contributions, the prior service and previous membership service of the member shall no longer be considered to be creditable service;
provided, however, that if a member whose creditable service has been cancelled in accordance with this subsection subsequently returns to membership for a period of five years, the member may thereafter repay in a lump sum the
amount withdrawn plus regular interest thereon from the date of withdrawal through the date of repayment and thereby increase his or her creditable service by the amount of creditable service lost when the member withdrew his or
her accumulated contributions.

(b1)
On and after January 1, 2022, when membership ceases as a result of a member’s withdrawal of his or her accumulated contributions, the prior service and previous membership service of the member shall no longer
be creditable service. If a member whose creditable service has been cancelled in accordance with this subsection subsequently returns to membership service and completes five years of membership service upon that return, then
the member may purchase an amount of creditable service corresponding to the total of the membership service associated with the withdrawn contributions, provided that the total amount of creditable service purchased under
this subsection may not exceed five years. The member shall purchase this service by paying a lump sum amount to the Annuity Savings Fund equal to the full liability increase due to the additional service credits on the basis
of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the following assumptions specific to this calculation: (i) the allowance shall be assumed to commence
at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance and (ii) assumed annual postretirement allowance increases as set by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary.
The increases as set by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary shall also include an administrative fee to be set by the Board.Subject to the requirements of this subsection, an employer may pay all
or part of the cost of a service purchase of a member in service. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the employer, the cost paid by the employer shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund. To the extent that
the purchase is paid by the member, the cost paid by the member shall be credited to the member’s annuity savings account.

On and after January 1, 1984, the creditable service of a member who was a member of the former Uniform Solicitorial or Uniform Clerks of Superior Court Retirement Systems at the time of merger of those Systems into this Consolidated Judicial Retirement
System and whose accumulated contributions are transferred from those Systems to this System, includes service that was creditable in the Uniform Solicitorial and Uniform Clerks of Superior Court Retirement Systems; and membership
service with those Retirement Systems is membership service with this Retirement System.

Any member may purchase creditable service for service as a judge, district attorney, or clerk of superior court, when not otherwise provided for in this section, and as a judge of any lawfully constituted court of this State inferior to the superior
court, not to include service as a magistrate, justice of the peace or mayor’s court judge. The member, after the transfer of any accumulated contributions from the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System or Local Governmental
Employees’ Retirement System, shall pay an amount equal to the full cost of the service credits calculated on the basis of the assumptions used for purposes of the actuarial valuation of the System’s liabilities, taking into account
the additional retirement allowance arising on account of the additional service credit commencing at the earliest age at which the member could retire with an unreduced retirement allowance as determined by the Board of Trustees
upon the advice of the consulting actuary. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subsection that provide for the purchase of service credits, the terms “full cost”, “full liability”, and “full actuarial cost” include
assumed annual post-retirement allowance increases, as determined by the Board of Trustees, from the earliest age at which a member could retire on an unreduced service allowance.

Any member may purchase creditable service for service as a member of the General Assembly not otherwise creditable under this section, provided the service is not credited in the Legislative Retirement Fund nor the Legislative Retirement System, and
further provided the member pays a lump sum amount equal to the full cost of the additional service credits calculated on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the System’s liabilities,
taking into account the additional retirement allowance arising on account of the additional service credits commencing at the earliest age at which a member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance as determined by the
Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary, plus an administrative fee to be set by the Board of Trustees. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subsection that provide for the purchase of service credits,
the terms “full cost”, “full liability”, and “full actuarial cost” include assumed annual post-retirement allowance increases, as determined by the Board of Trustees, from the earliest age at which a member could retire on an unreduced
service allowance.

The creditable service of a member who was a member of the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, or the Legislative Retirement System and whose accumulated contributions and reserves are
transferred from that System to this System, includes service that was creditable in the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, or the Legislative Retirement System,
and membership service with those Retirement Systems is membership service with this Retirement System.

If a member who has not vested in this System on July 1, 2007, is convicted of an offense listed in

G.S. 135-75.1

for acts committed after July 1, 2007, then that member shall forfeit all benefits under this System. If a member who has vested in this System on July 1, 2007, is convicted of an offense listed in

G.S. 135-75.1

for acts committed after July 1, 2007, then that member is not entitled to any creditable service that accrued after July 1, 2007, regardless of whether that creditable service was earned by virtue of membership
in the System, accrued by conversion of sick leave at the point of the member’s retirement, accrued by transfer of service from another retirement system, purchased by the member in accordance with this Chapter, or accrued by any
other means. No member shall forfeit any benefit or creditable service earned from a position not as a justice, judge, district attorney, or clerk of superior court. For purposes of this subsection, creditable service attributable
to the conversion of sick leave accrues in this System on the date of retirement, service transferred to this System from another system accrues in this System on the effective date of the transfer, and purchased service accrues
in this System on the date of the purchase.

On and after July 1, 2007, the creditable service of a member who was a public defender and a member of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System at the time of transfer of membership from the previous system to this System shall include service
as a public defender that was creditable in the previous system immediately prior to July 1, 2007. The accumulated contributions, creditable service, and reserves, if any, of a member as a public defender shall be transferred from
the previous system to this System in the same manner as prescribed under

G.S. 135-28.1

as it pertained to judges of the district court division of the General Court of Justice.

On and after July 1, 2008, the creditable service of a member who is the Director of Indigent Defense Services and a member of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System at the time of transfer of membership from the previous system to this
System shall include service as the Director of Indigent Defense Services beginning July 1, 2004, that was creditable in the previous system immediately prior to July 1, 2008. The accumulated contributions, creditable service,
and reserves, if any, of a member as the Director of Indigent Defense Services beginning July 1, 2004, shall be transferred from the previous system to this System in the same manner as prescribed under

G.S. 135-28.1

as it pertained to judges of the district court division of the General Court of Justice.

If a member who is in service and has not vested in this System on December 1, 2012, is convicted of an offense listed in

G.S. 135-75.1

A for acts committed after December 1, 2012, then that member shall forfeit all benefits under this System, except for a return of member contributions plus interest. If a member who is in service and has vested
in this System on December 1, 2012, is convicted of an offense listed in

G.S. 135-75.1

A for acts committed after December 1, 2012, then that member is not entitled to any creditable service that accrued after December 1, 2012, regardless of whether that creditable service was earned by virtue of membership
in the System, accrued by conversion of sick leave at the point of the member’s retirement, accrued by transfer of service from another retirement system, purchased by the member in accordance with this Chapter, or accrued by any
other means. For purposes of this subsection, creditable service attributable to the conversion of sick leave accrues in this System on the date of retirement, service transferred to this System from another system accrues in this
System on the effective date of the transfer, and purchased service accrues in this System on the date of the purchase.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; 1977, c. 936; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1031, ss. 14, 15; 1985, c. 649, s. 1; 1989, c. 255, s. 21(a); 1999-237, s. 28.24(c); 2003-284, s. 30.18(f); 2007-179, s. 4(b); 2007-323, s. 28.21B(h); 2008-107,
s. 26.24(h); 2012-193, s. 6; 2020-29, s. 1(d), (e); 2020-48, s. 4.4(e), (f); 2021-57, ss. 3.2(a), 3.2(b).